Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-106
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Public Accountancy Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Board means the Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy;

(2) Certificate means a certificate issued under sections 1-114 to 1-124;

(3) Firm means a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation engaged in the practice of public accountancy in this state entitled to register with the board or a proprietorship engaged in the practice of public accountancy in this state;

(4) Partnership includes, but is not limited to, a limited liability partnership;

(5) Peer review means a review of one or more aspects of the professional work of a firm that either or both performs attest engagements or performs compilations by an active certified public accountant who is the holder of a permit issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136 or the equivalent issued by another state and who is not affiliated with the firm being reviewed;

(6) Permit means a permit to engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state issued under section 1-136;

(7) Practice privilege means the privilege of an accountant to practice public accountancy or hold himself or herself out as a certified public accountant in this state in accordance with section 1-125.01;

(8) State means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; and

(9) Temporary practice privilege means the privilege of a foreign accountant to temporarily practice public accountancy in this state in accordance with section 1-125.02.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 1, p. 55;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB159, § 2.